Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 17. Wyoming Traditional Food Act

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wy. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 35-7-1701.
Short title.

This article is known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Traditional Food Act.”

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 35-7-1702.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Traditional event or activity” means an occasion where potentially hazardous and not potentially hazardous foods have traditionally been, and are presently, stored and prepared in a private home or a place other than an establishment, which is equipped for the storage and preparation of food for consumption or use in conducting traditional activities, including but not limited to the preparation of food:

For family and nonpaying guests;

For weddings, funerals, potluck dinners, charitable dinners and charitable cook-offs or functions as defined in W.S. 35-7-110(a)(xxix);

For the sales of donated foods which are prepared for consumption and the sales are sponsored by a nonprofit entity as a fundraiser to support its purposes;

For outdoor activities such as picnics, barbeques, roundups, camping or outdoor work conducted by employees or volunteers;

By utilizing kitchen equipment provided by employers as a convenience for the storage and preparation of foods for consumption on the premises by employees and nonpaying guests.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-7-1703.
Wyoming Traditional Food Act; purpose.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, there shall be no licensure, permitting, certification, inspection, packaging or labeling required by any state governmental agency or any agency of any political subdivision of the state which pertains to the preparation, serving, use, consumption or storage of foods at a traditional event or activity. Nothing in this article shall preclude an agency from providing assistance, consultation or inspection, when requested by the traditional event or activity organizer.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 1.